Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-220
Medical examinations; employer, defined.

As used in sections 48-220 to 48-223, unless the context otherwise requires, employer shall mean and include an individual, a partnership, a limited liability company, an association, a corporation, a legal representative, a trustee, a receiver, a trustee in bankruptcy, and any common carrier by rail, motor, water, air, or express company doing business in or operating within the state.

Laws 1963, c. 280, § 1, p. 837;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 286.